Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Department of Transportation, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $16,930,280 for  debt service
on the State Radio Project and highway improvement projects.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and fed-
eral funds received as reimbursement from the United States Department  of Transportation,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in this section, collected  or re-
ceived by the Department of Transportation, for the following purposes:
(1) Capital improvement............. $ 17,734,129
(2) Maintenance.......................... $ 568,670,189
(3) Project delivery and
support..................................  $ 2,534,851,549
(4) Local government program ... $ 565,396,171
(5) Driver and motor vehicle
services ................................. $ 279,871,126
(6) State Board of Towing .......... $ 412,080
(7) Commerce and compliance ... $ 102,475,648
(8) Policy, data and analysis ...... $ 202,748,479
(9) Public transportation............ $ 318,402,800
(10) ODOT administrative
services ................................. $ 250,660,507
(11) Finance and budget............... $ 81,365,080
(12) Debt service .......................... $ 443,275,713
(13) Oregon Transportation
Infrastructure Fund,
wildlife corridor projects....... $ 7,000,000
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
Enrolled House Bill 5040 (HB 5040-A) Page 1
of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 2 of this 2023 Act, col-
lected or received by the Department of Transportation, for the following purposes:
(1) Driver and motor
vehicle services ..................... $ 31,226,793
(2) Commerce and compliance ... $ 14,197,291
(3) Policy, data and analysis ...... $ 215,163
(4) Public transportation............ $ 145,253,623
(5) Finance and budget............... $ 287,347
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$136,144,810 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Department of Transportation for debt service.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $650,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from  the Veterans’ Services Fund established
under ORS 406.140  to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs and transferred to the Depart-
ment of Transportation for veteran transit services.
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$19,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by  the Department of Transportation from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Department of Transportation,  for the
Newberg-Dundee Bypass Project.
SECTION 7. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, expenditures by the Department
of Transportation from federal funds for debt service  on Build America Bonds are not lim-
ited.
SECTION 8. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, expenditures by the Department
of Transportation from the Oregon Transportation  Infrastructure Fund established under
ORS 367.015 for debt service and for internally reimbursed expenditures are not limited.
SECTION 9. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled House Bill 5040 (HB 5040-A) Page 2
Passed by House June 7, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5040 (HB 5040-A) Page 3